California, session 20252026, SB343.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51225.45 is added to the Education Code, to read:51225.45. (a) A local educational agency may deem a pupil who successfully completes a course, or a series of courses, provided in an apprenticeship or preapprenticeship program to have fulfilled the requirements of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3 if the apprenticeship or preapprenticeship program meets all of the following requirements:(1) The program is approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards or registered with the United States Department of Labor.(2) The instructional content of the coursework aligns with the model curriculum standards for career technical education adopted pursuant to Section 51226.(3) The coursework is supervised by qualified industry instructors approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code or certified by the North America’s Building Trades Unions.(b) For purposes of this section, a “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SECTION 1.Section 44260.15 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 44260.1, to read:44260.15.(a)The commission shall grant a waiver from the minimum requirements prescribed in Sections 44260 and 44260.1 to an individual meeting all of the following requirements:(1)Possesses a valid industry-recognized certification in a trade designated by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b).(2)Has a minimum of five years of documented work experience in a trade designated by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b).(3)Successfully completes a commission-approved course on teaching and classroom management.(b)The commission shall develop and maintain a list of designated trades eligible for a waiver pursuant to subdivision (a). The list of designated trades shall include, but is not limited to, general contracting, masonry, welding, heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC), electrical, auto and diesel repair, healthcare, and medical field trades. The commission shall consider the following factors when designating additional trades to include on the list:(1)Whether the trade requires a high level of skill and knowledge.(2)Whether there is a demonstrated shortage of qualified career technical education instructors in the trade.(3)Whether the trade has established industry-recognized certification programs that include all of the following:(A)A minimum of 4,000 hours of documented, supervised work experience in the trade.(B)A comprehensive examination process covering both theoretical knowledge and practical skills.(C)Ongoing professional development and continuing education requirements.(D)A system for tracking and reporting work experience and continuing education to an industry-recognized certification body or state licensing board.(c)The commission shall adopt regulations to implement this section.